Washington statutes.
RCW 35.13.070

Election method—Conduct of election.

An annexation election shall be held in accordance with the general election laws of the state, and only registered voters who have resided in the area proposed to be annexed for ninety days immediately preceding the election shall be allowed to vote therein.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.13.070. Prior: 1961 c 282 s 15; prior: 1907 c 245 s 4, part; RRS s 8899, part.]

NOTES:

Conduct of elections: RCW 29A.60.010.